Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB447.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 635.11. Coverage for Prostate Cancer Screening.--(a) A health insurance policy offered, issued or renewed in this Commonwealth shall provide coverage for all expenses associated with prostate cancer screenings no less than annually for covered persons who are at least forty years of age and are at high risk of developing prostate cancer based on one of the 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 following factors:(1) diagnosis of the covered person or a first-degree relative with a genetic alteration or cancer associated with increased risk of prostate cancer;(2) family history of prostate cancer; or(3) other factors, if a physician determines that early detection for prostate cancer is medically appropriate.(b) The coverage required under this section shall not be subject to cost-sharing.(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the terms in this section shall be given the same meaning as in section 2102.(2) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Cost-sharing" means the share of the health care costs covered by a health insurance policy that a covered person pays out-of-pocket. The term includes a deductible, coinsurance, copayment or similar charge. The term does not include a premium, a balance billed amount from an out-of-network provider or the cost of a noncovered service."Family history of prostate cancer" means that a first-degree relative of a covered person was diagnosed with, developed or died as a result of prostate cancer."First-degree relative" means a biological parent, full biological sibling or biological child."Prostate cancer screening" includes prostate-specific antigen tests and digital rectal examinations.Section 2. This act shall apply as follows:(1) For health insurance policies for which either rates or forms are required to be filed by the Federal Government 20250SB0447PN0810 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or the Insurance Department, this act shall apply to any policy for which a form or rate is first filed on or after 180 days after the effective date of this paragraph.(2) For health insurance policies for which neither rates nor forms are required to be filed with the Federal Government or the Insurance Department, this act shall apply to any policy issued or renewed on or after 180 days after the effective date of this paragraph.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0447PN0810 - 3 - 123456789